Washington statutes.
RCW 39.56.020

Rate on municipal warrants.

All county, city, town and school warrants, and all warrants or other evidences of indebtedness, drawn upon or payable from any public funds, shall bear interest at a rate or rates as authorized by the issuing authority.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 106; 1899 c 80 s 4; RRS s 7302. Prior: 1895 c 136 s 3.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Cities and towns, local improvement district warrants, interest rate: RCW 35.45.130.